Utah statutes.
11-25-18.   Financing provided to participating parties -- Agreements --
Contents.
The agency may provide financing to any participating party for the purpose of
residential rehabilitation authorized pursuant to a comprehensive residential
rehabilitation financing program. All agreements for this financing shall
provide that the design of the residential rehabilitation shall be subject to
such standards as may be established by the agency and that the work of such
residential rehabilitation shall be subject to such supervision as the agency
deems necessary.
